dictionaries/cy_GB.aff
SFX E Y 278
SFX E   io          iaf        io
SFX E   io          ni         io
SFX E   io          ni'i       io
SFX E   io          ni'u       io
SFX E   io          ni'ch      io
SFX E   io          ni'n       io
SFX E   io          ni'r       io
SFX E   io          ia         io
SFX E   io          ia'i       io
SFX E   io          ia'u       io
SFX E   io          ia'ch      io
SFX E   io          ia'n       io
SFX E   io          ia'r       io
SFX E   io          iwn        io
SFX E   io          iwch       io
SFX E   io          iant       io
SFX E   io          nir        io
SFX E   io          nit        io
SFX E   io          iet        io
SFX E   io          iai        io
SFX E   io          iai'i      io
SFX E   io          iai'u      io
SFX E   io          iai'ch     io
SFX E   io          iai'n      io
SFX E   io          iai'r      io
SFX E   io          iem        io
SFX E   io          iech       io
SFX E   io          ient       io
SFX E   io          nid        io
SFX E   io          iais       io
SFX E   io          iaist      io
SFX E   io          iodd       io
SFX E   io          iasom      io
SFX E   io          iasoch     io
SFX E   io          iasant     io
SFX E   io          iwyd       io
SFX E   io          iaswn      io
SFX E   io          iasit      io
SFX E   io          iaset      io
SFX E   io          iasai      io
SFX E   io          iasai'i    io
SFX E   io          iasai'u    io
SFX E   io          iasai'ch   io
SFX E   io          iasai'n    io
SFX E   io          iasai'r    io
SFX E   io          iasem      io
SFX E   io          iasech     io
SFX E   io          iasent     io
SFX E   io          iasid      io
SFX E   io          ied        io
SFX E   io          iwyf       io
SFX E   io          nych       io
SFX E   io          iom        io
SFX E   io          ioch       io
SFX E   io          iont       io
SFX E   io          ier        io
SFX E   io          ies        io
SFX E   io          iest       io
SFX E   io          ith        io
SFX E   io          iff        io
SFX E   io          ion        io
SFX E   io          ian        io
SFX E   ied         iaf        ied
SFX E   ied         ni         ied
SFX E   ied         ni'i       ied
SFX E   ied         ni'u       ied
SFX E   ied         ni'ch      ied
SFX E   ied         ni'n       ied
SFX E   ied         ni'r       ied
SFX E   ied         ia         ied
SFX E   ied         ia'i       ied
SFX E   ied         ia'u       ied
SFX E   ied         ia'ch      ied
SFX E   ied         ia'n       ied
SFX E   ied         ia'r       ied
SFX E   ied         iwn        ied
SFX E   ied         iwch       ied
SFX E   ied         iant       ied
SFX E   ied         nir        ied
SFX E   ied         nit        ied
SFX E   ied         iet        ied
SFX E   ied         iai        ied
SFX E   ied         iai'i      ied
SFX E   ied         iai'u      ied
SFX E   ied         iai'ch     ied
SFX E   ied         iai'n      ied
SFX E   ied         iai'r      ied
SFX E   ied         iem        ied
SFX E   ied         iech       ied
SFX E   ied         ient       ied
SFX E   ied         nid        ied
SFX E   ied         iais       ied
SFX E   ied         iaist      ied
SFX E   ied         ieddd      ied
SFX E   ied         iasom      ied
SFX E   ied         iasoch     ied
SFX E   ied         iasant     ied
SFX E   ied         iwyd       ied
SFX E   ied         iaswn      ied
SFX E   ied         iasit      ied
SFX E   ied         iaset      ied
SFX E   ied         iasai      ied
SFX E   ied         iasai'i    ied
SFX E   ied         iasai'u    ied
SFX E   ied         iasai'ch   ied
SFX E   ied         iasai'n    ied
SFX E   ied         iasai'r    ied
SFX E   ied         iasem      ied
SFX E   ied         iasech     ied
SFX E   ied         iasent     ied
SFX E   ied         iasid      ied
SFX E   ied         ied        ied
SFX E   ied         iwyf       ied
SFX E   ied         nych       ied
SFX E   ied         iedm       ied
SFX E   ied         iedch      ied
SFX E   ied         iednt      ied
SFX E   ied         ier        ied
SFX E   ied         ies        ied
SFX E   ied         iest       ied
SFX E   ied         ith        ied
SFX E   ied         iff        ied
SFX E   ied         iedn       ied
SFX E   ied         ian        ied
SFX E   ian         iaf        ian
SFX E   ian         ni         ian
SFX E   ian         ni'i       ian
SFX E   ian         ni'u       ian
SFX E   ian         ni'ch      ian
SFX E   ian         ni'n       ian
SFX E   ian         ni'r       ian
SFX E   ian         ia         ian
SFX E   ian         ia'i       ian
SFX E   ian         ia'u       ian
SFX E   ian         ia'ch      ian
SFX E   ian         ia'n       ian
SFX E   ian         ia'r       ian
SFX E   ian         iwn        ian
SFX E   ian         iwch       ian
SFX E   ian         iant       ian
SFX E   ian         nir        ian
SFX E   ian         nit        ian
SFX E   ian         iet        ian
SFX E   ian         iai        ian
SFX E   ian         iai'i      ian
SFX E   ian         iai'u      ian
SFX E   ian         iai'ch     ian
SFX E   ian         iai'n      ian
SFX E   ian         iai'r      ian
SFX E   ian         iem        ian
SFX E   ian         iech       ian
SFX E   ian         ient       ian
SFX E   ian         nid        ian
SFX E   ian         iais       ian
SFX E   ian         iaist      ian
SFX E   ian         iandd      ian
SFX E   ian         iasom      ian
SFX E   ian         iasoch     ian
SFX E   ian         iasant     ian
SFX E   ian         iwyd       ian
SFX E   ian         iaswn      ian
SFX E   ian         iasit      ian
SFX E   ian         iaset      ian
SFX E   ian         iasai      ian
SFX E   ian         iasai'i    ian
SFX E   ian         iasai'u    ian
SFX E   ian         iasai'ch   ian
SFX E   ian         iasai'n    ian
SFX E   ian         iasai'r    ian
SFX E   ian         iasem      ian
SFX E   ian         iasech     ian
SFX E   ian         iasent     ian
SFX E   ian         iasid      ian
SFX E   ian         ied        ian
SFX E   ian         iwyf       ian
SFX E   ian         nych       ian
SFX E   ian         ianm       ian
SFX E   ian         ianch      ian
SFX E   ian         iannt      ian
SFX E   ian         ier        ian
SFX E   ian         ies        ian
SFX E   ian         iest       ian
SFX E   ian         ith        ian
SFX E   ian         iff        ian
SFX E   ian         iann       ian
SFX E   ian         ian        ian
SFX E   oi          oaf        oi
SFX E   oi          ô          oi
SFX E   oi          own        oi
SFX E   oi          owch       oi
SFX E   oi          oant       oi
SFX E   oi          oir        oi
SFX E   oi          oit        oi
SFX E   oi          oet        oi
SFX E   oi          ôi         oi
SFX E   oi          oem        oi
SFX E   oi          oech       oi
SFX E   oi          oent       oi
SFX E   oi          oid        oi
SFX E   oi          ois        oi
SFX E   oi          oist       oi
SFX E   oi          oes        oi
SFX E   oi          oesom      oi
SFX E   oi          oesoch     oi
SFX E   oi          oesant     oi
SFX E   oi          owyd       oi
SFX E   oi          oeswn      oi
SFX E   oi          oesit      oi
SFX E   oi          oeset      oi
SFX E   oi          oesai      oi
SFX E   oi          oesai'i    oi
SFX E   oi          oesai'u    oi
SFX E   oi          oesai'ch   oi
SFX E   oi          oesai'n    oi
SFX E   oi          oesai'r    oi
SFX E   oi          oesem      oi
SFX E   oi          oesech     oi
SFX E   oi          oesent     oi
SFX E   oi          oesid      oi
SFX E   oi          oed        oi
SFX E   oi          oer        oi
SFX E   au          af         au
SFX E   au          ei         au
SFX E   au          ei'i       au
SFX E   au          ei'u       au
SFX E   au          ei'ch      au
SFX E   au          ei'n       au
SFX E   au          ei'r       au
SFX E   au          a          au
SFX E   au          awn        au
SFX E   au          ewch       au
