dictionaries/cy_GB.dic
llyfnhau/ENQ
gulhau/ENQ
fraslunio/ENQ
arlunio/ENQ
gwblhau/ENQ
gwydnhau/ENQ
bywhau/ENQ
cyfiawnhau/ELNQ
gyfloi/ENQ
camsynio/ELNQ
llawenhau/ENQ
atgnoi/ENQ
aildderbynio/ENPQ
sonio/ENQ
dywalhau/ENQ
bwnio/ENQ
fywhau/ENQ
hymbaratoi/ENQ
hymbellhau/ENQ
ailgynllunio/ENQ
synio/ENQ
llwfrhau/ENQ
haflanhau/ENQ
hymsonio/ENQ
prinhau/ELNQ
hiselhau/ENQ
gwanhau/ENQ
cryfhau/ELNQ
pwnio/ELNQ
lwfrhau/ENQ
tanio/ELNQ
gyfiawnhau/ENQ
cyffroi/ELNQ
atgryfhau/ENQ
gamddarlunio/ENQ
hymsynio/ENQ
ddiffinio/ENQ
hirbarhau/ENQ
sarhau/ENQ
marwhau/ENQ
dyfrhau/ENQ
hatgnoi/ENQ
dewhau/ENQ
prenio/ELNQ
cil-gnoi/ELNQ
gnoi/ENQ
cydgrynhoi/ELNQ
ffoi/ENQ
crasgnoi/ELNQ
warhau/ENQ
gamsynio/ENQ
taflunio/ELNQ
gydlawenhau/ENQ
mawrhau/ENQ
lanhau/ENQ
sgrinio/ENQ
ddyfnhau/ENQ
gydgynllunio/ENQ
ddeffroi/ENQ
arwhau/ENQ
hesbonio/ENQ
farwhau/ENQ
barhau/ENQ
ddywalhau/ENQ
acwafeithrinio/ENPQ
sicrhau/ENQ
ymsonio/ENQ
iselhau/ENQ
blaengynllunio/ENQ
trugarhau/ELNQ
cloi/ELNQ
gydgrynhoi/ENQ
finio/ENQ
llunio/ENQ
ailfywhau/ENQ
brinhau/ENQ
ymsynio/ENQ
aflanhau/ENQ
tewhau/ELNQ
fawrhau/ENQ
ffiwdalhau/ENQ
minio/ENQ
gil-gnoi/ENQ
grasgnoi/ENQ
ddatgloi/ENQ
crynhau/ELNQ
rhwyddhau/ENQ
gryfhau/ENQ
rhaglunio/ENQ
hymdrinio/ENQ
gyffroi/ENQ
derbynio/ENQ
crynhoi/ELNQ
cadarnhau/ELNQ
hail-lunio/ENQ
boddhau/ENQ
hedifarhau/ENQ
braslunio/ENQ
herfynio/ENQ
hailgynllunio/ENQ
esbonio/ENQ
glanio/ENQ
rag-gynllunio/ENQ
dynhau/ENQ
lunio/ENQ
cyfanhau/ELNQ
fwyhau/ENQ
ymbaratoi/ENQ
ymbellhau/ENQ
feddalhau/ENQ
cydlawenhau/ELNQ
anghydsynio/ENQ
bruddhau/ENQ
cyflunio/ELNQ
rhyddhau/EN
byrhau/ENQ
wellhau/ENQ
ordoi/EMNQ
deffroi/ENQ
tynhau/ELNQ
cnoi/ELNQ
dyfnhau/ENQ
fyrhau/ENQ
wanhau/ENQ
brenio/ENQ
ymdrinio/ENQ
hysgafnhau/ENQ
erfynio/ENQ
lymhau/ENQ
grynhau/ENQ
leihau/ENQ
rhag-drinio/ENQ
paratoi/ELNQ
meinhau/ENQ
dderbynio/ENQ
gyfanhau/ENQ
flaengynllunio/ENQ
grynhoi/ENQ
cam-drinio/ELNQ
pellhau/ELNQ
danio/ENQ
lawenhau/ENQ
gynllunio/ENQ
foddhau/ENQ
cydsynio/ELNQ
daflunio/ENQ
hymgryfhau/ENQ
siwrhau/ENQ
gyflunio/ENQ
feinhau/ENQ
hosgoi/ENQ
datgloi/ENQ
gweddwhau/ENQ
drinio/ENQ
ribinio/EMNQ
amlhau/ENQ
llwyrlanhau/ENQ
gam-drinio/ENQ
ddylunio/ENQ
gwarhau/ENQ
breuhau/ENQ
mwynhau/ENQ
hensynio/ENQ
darlunio/ENQ
mwyhau/ENQ
wydnhau/ENQ
ail-lunio/ENQ
edifarhau/ENQ
hymlawenhau/ENQ
hatgryfhau/ENQ
ymlawenhau/ENQ
hanghydsynio/ENQ
gydsynio/ENQ
haflunio/ENQ
dyfalbarhau/ENQ
weddwhau/ENQ
baratoi/ENQ
meddalhau/ENQ
bellhau/ENQ
glanhau/ENQ
ddyfalbarhau/ENQ
hufuddhau/ENQ
garwhau/ENQ
cwblhau/ELNQ
gwellhau/ENQ
hamlhau/ENQ
fwynhau/ENQ
trinio/ELNQ
drugarhau/ENQ
cribinio/ELNQ
hadfywhau/ENQ
osgoi/ENQ
camddarlunio/ELNQ
cynhinio/ELNQ
bynio/ENQ
ddyfrhau/ENQ
harlunio/ENQ
parhau/ELNQ
sypynio/ENQ
ensynio/ENQ
hailfywhau/ENQ
rwyddhau/ENQ
gloi/ENQ
ryddhau/EN
raglunio/ENQ
ddarlunio/ENQ
trymhau/ELNQ
aflunio/ENQ
llymhau/ENQ
ysgafnhau/ENQ
pynio/ELNQ
lleihau/ENQ
cydgynllunio/ELNQ
diffinio/ENQ
rhag-gynllunio/ENQ
hwyhau/ENQ
lwyrlanhau/ENQ
freuhau/ENQ
gadarnhau/ENQ
culhau/ELNQ
gynhinio/ENQ
ufuddhau/ENQ
cyfloi/ELNQ
ffonio/ENQ
drymhau/ENQ
pruddhau/ELNQ
dylunio/ENQ
cynllunio/ELNQ
ymgryfhau/ENQ
adfywhau/ENQ
lyfnhau/ENQ
rag-drinio/ENQ
